District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

31-5706

Issuance of permit to do business.

Repealed.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1312, ch. 854, § 754
June 14, 1994, D.C. Law 10-128, § 402(b), 41DCR 2096
May 21, 1997, D.C. Law 11-268,§ 10(n), 44 DCR 1730
Apr. 29, 1998, D.C. Law 12-86, § 1237(a), 45 DCR 1172

History

1981 Ed., § 35-1206.
1973 Ed., § 35-906.

Prior Codifications

Department of Insurance abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 31-5702.

D.C. Law 12-261, title II, § 2003(gg)(2) ( 46 DCR 3142), eff. April 20, 1999, amended § 35-1206 § 31-5706, 2001 Ed. without reference to its prior repeal.

Editor's Notes